Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.020

License fees to general fund.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all moneys received as fees for the issuance of licenses upon examination, and the renewal thereof, and paid into the state treasury, shall be credited to the general fund; and all expenses incurred in connection with the examination of applicants for licenses, and the issuance and renewal of licenses upon examination shall be paid by warrants drawn against the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.020. Prior: 1921 c 81 s 1; RRS s 5511.]